Illinois, session 104th, HB4308.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 5Sections 11a-3 and 11a-4 as follows: 6    (755 ILCS 5/11a-3)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11a-3)7    Sec. 11a-3. Adjudication of disability; Power to appoint 8guardian. 9    (a) Upon the filing of a petition by a reputable person or 10by the alleged person with a disability himself or on its own 11motion, the court may adjudge a person to be a person with a 12disability, but only if it has been demonstrated by clear and 13convincing evidence that the person is a person with a 14disability as defined in Section 11a-2. If the court adjudges 15a person to be a person with a disability, the court may 16appoint (1) a guardian of his person, if it has been 17demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that because of 18his disability he lacks sufficient understanding or capacity 19to make or communicate responsible decisions concerning the 20care of his person, or (2) a guardian of his estate, if it has 21been demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that 22because of his disability he is unable to manage his estate or 23financial affairs, or (3) a guardian of his person and of his   HB4308- 2 -LRB104 16803 JRC 30212 b1estate, or (4) . The court may appoint co-guardians in 2accordance with Section 11a-15. If a petition for guardianship 3is filed by a corporation, nonprofit organization, or other 4entity with no legally recognized relationship to the alleged 5person with a disability, the court shall appoint the State 6Guardian or county public guardian as the guardian of the 7person or estate or both if the requirements of this Section 8are met, except in cases in counties in which there is no 9sitting public guardian. 10    (b) Guardianship shall be utilized only as is necessary to 11promote the well-being of the person with a disability, to 12protect him from neglect, exploitation, or abuse, and to 13encourage development of his maximum self-reliance and 14independence. Guardianship shall be ordered only to the extent 15necessitated by the individual's actual mental, physical and 16adaptive limitations. The order shall conform with Sections 1711a-12 and 11a-14. 18(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22.) 19    (755 ILCS 5/11a-4)20    Sec. 11a-4. Temporary guardian. 21    (a) Prior to the appointment of a guardian under this 22Article, pending an appeal in relation to the appointment, or 23pending the completion of a citation proceeding brought 24pursuant to Section 23-3 of this Act, or upon a guardian's 25death, incapacity, or resignation, the court may appoint a   HB4308- 3 -LRB104 16803 JRC 30212 b1temporary guardian upon a showing of the necessity therefor 2for the immediate welfare and protection of the alleged person 3with a disability or his or her estate and subject to such 4conditions as the court may prescribe. In cases in which a 5petition for guardianship of an alleged person with a 6disability is filed by a corporation, nonprofit, or other 7entity with no legally recognized relationship to that person, 8the court shall appoint the State Guardian or county public 9guardian as temporary guardian of that person under this 10Section if the requirements of this Section are met, except in 11cases in counties in which there is no sitting public 12guardian. A petition for the appointment of a temporary 13guardian for an alleged person with a disability shall be 14filed at the time of or subsequent to the filing of a petition 15for adjudication of disability and appointment of a guardian. 16The petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian shall 17state the facts upon which it is based and the name, the post 18office address, and, in the case of an individual, the age and 19occupation of the proposed temporary guardian. In determining 20the necessity for temporary guardianship, the immediate 21welfare and protection of the alleged person with a disability 22and his or her estate shall be of paramount concern, and the 23interests of the petitioner, any care provider, or any other 24party shall not outweigh the interests of the alleged person 25with a disability. The temporary guardian shall have the 26limited powers and duties of a guardian of the person or of the   HB4308- 4 -LRB104 16803 JRC 30212 b1estate which are specifically enumerated by court order. The 2court order shall state the actual harm identified by the 3court that necessitates temporary guardianship or any 4extension thereof. 5    (a-5) Notice of the time and place of the hearing on a 6petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian shall be 7given, not less than 3 days before the hearing, by mail or in 8person to the alleged person with a disability, to the 9proposed temporary guardian, and to those persons whose names 10and addresses are listed in the petition for adjudication of 11disability and appointment of a guardian under Section 11a-8. 12The court, upon a finding of good cause, may waive the notice 13requirement under this subsection. 14    (a-10) Notice of the time and place of the hearing on a 15petition to revoke the appointment of a temporary guardian 16shall be given, not less than 3 days before the hearing, by 17mail or in person to the temporary guardian, to the petitioner 18on whose petition the temporary guardian was appointed, and to 19those persons whose names and addresses are listed in the 20petition for adjudication of disability and appointment of a 21guardian under Section 11a-8. The court, upon a finding of 22good cause, may waive the notice requirements under this 23subsection. 24    (b) The temporary guardianship shall expire within 60 days 25after the appointment or whenever a guardian is regularly 26appointed, whichever occurs first. No extension shall be   HB4308- 5 -LRB104 16803 JRC 30212 b1granted except: 2        (1) In a case where there has been an adjudication of 3    disability, an extension shall be granted: 4            (i) pending the disposition on appeal of an 5        adjudication of disability;6            (ii) pending the completion of a citation 7        proceeding brought pursuant to Section 23-3;8            (iii) pending the appointment of a successor 9        guardian in a case where the former guardian has 10        resigned, has become incapacitated, or is deceased; or11            (iv) where the guardian's powers have been 12        suspended pursuant to a court order. 13        (2) In a case where there has not been an adjudication 14    of disability, an extension shall be granted pending the 15    disposition of a petition brought pursuant to Section 16    11a-8 so long as the court finds it is in the best 17    interests of the alleged person with a disability to 18    extend the temporary guardianship so as to protect the 19    alleged person with a disability from any potential abuse, 20    neglect, self-neglect, exploitation, or other harm and 21    such extension lasts no more than 120 days from the date 22    the temporary guardian was originally appointed. 23    The ward shall have the right any time after the 24appointment of a temporary guardian is made to petition the 25court to revoke the appointment of the temporary guardian.26(Source: P.A. 102-72, eff. 1-1-22; 102-120, eff 7-23-21;   HB4308- 6 -LRB104 16803 JRC 30212 b1102-687, eff. 12-17-21.)